Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 14 Fees and Costs and Security Therefor

Cross references. —

As to fees in connection with special appointments to serve process, see §

1-6-103

.

As to fee and costs in connection with service of process on secretary of state as agent for nonresident motorist, see §

1-6-301

.

As to jury costs upon change of venue or judge, see §

1-7-101

.

As to costs in connection with continuances, see §

1-9-102

.

As to costs in connection with tender and offer to confess judgment, see §§

1-10-101

to

1-10-104

.

As to jury fees, see §§

1-11-301

to

1-11-304

.

As to costs in connection with attachments, see §

1-15-105

.

As to costs in connection with garnishments, see §§

1-15-410

to

1-15-414

.

As to fees of district court commissioner, see §

5-3-308

.

As to fees of district court reporter, see §

5-3-410

.

For authority of cities or towns to prescribe by ordinance costs in trials before municipal courts, see §

5-6-108

.

As to filing fees in circuit courts, see §

5-9-135

.

As to costs in trial for removal of county officer, see §

18-3-902

.

As to costs in divorce action for insanity, see §

20-2-105

.

For provision that the court may decree costs and enforce its decree in actions to annul or affirm marriage or for divorce as in other cases, see §

20-2-108

.

As to payment of fees and costs in actions under Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see §

20-4-163

.

As to costs in worker's compensation cases, see §§

27-14-105

,

27-14-203

, and

27-14-511

.

As to costs in connection with suits or actions to obtain judgment or enforce lien with reference to irrigation systems constructed under Carey Act, see §

36-7-326

.

As to costs in connection with judgments by court on proposed work of district drainage commissioners, see §§

41-9-231

to

41-9-233

.

What constitutes proper costs in an action,

to be assessed against the losing party, is not very clearly established by either statute or rule. Roberts Constr. Co. v. Vondriska, 547 P.2d 1171,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1976).

This chapter contains several provisions relating to the allowance of costs, but nowhere is there a statutory enumeration of what charges are included. Roberts Constr. Co. v. Vondriska, 547 P.2d 1171,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1976).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Collecting Debt in Wyoming: The Fair Debt Collection Practices Act as a Trap for the Unwary,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 731 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Costs § 1 et seq.; 31A Am. Jur. 2d Expert and Opinion Evidence §§ 5 to 16; 81 Am. Jur. 2d Witnesses §§ 66 to 72.

Right of party who is attorney and appears for himself to award of attorney's fees against opposing party as element of costs, 78 ALR3d 1119.

Attorney's personal liability for expenses incurred in relation to services for client, 66 ALR4th 256.

Recoverability of cost of computerized legal research under 28 USC § 1920 or Rule 54(d), Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, 80 ALR Fed 168.

20 C.J.S. Costs § 1 et seq.; 98 C.J.S. Witnesses §§ 119 to 121, 142, 147 to 160, 162 to 164, 173, 201, 203, 226.

§ 1-14-101.
“Folio” defined.

The term folio as used
in this act means one hundred (100) words. Four (4) figures shall
be counted as one (1) word.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 34; R.S. 1887, § 1224; R.S. 1899, § 4314; C.S. 1910, § 5175; C.S. 1920, § 6451; R.S. 1931, § 89-1617; C.S. 1945, § 3-3717; W.S. 1957, § 1-194; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to ch. 45, Laws 1882, which was a general law concerning fees and compensation of county and precinct officers and which has been largely superseded. However, §§ 23 and 25 to 32, 34 and 35 appear herein as §§

1-14-101

,

1-14-102

,

1-14-106

to

1-14-108

and

1-14-113

to

1-14-118

.

Applied

in

Carlson v. Carlson, 888 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 1-14-102.
Witness
fees; fees for expert witnesses in civil and criminal cases.

Witnesses are entitled to receive the following minimum fees:

For attending before any court or grand jury, or before any judge, referee or commissioner, ten dollars ($10.00) per day, and five dollars ($5.00) for half a day; and

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 2.

Mileage at the rate set in W.S.

9-3-103

for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in going to and returning from place of attendance.

In any civil or criminal case, any party may call expert witnesses to testify and if the court finds any witness to be a qualified expert and the expert gives expert testimony which is admitted as evidence in the case, the expert witness shall be allowed witness fees of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day or such other amount as the court allows according to the circumstances of the case. Expert witness fees may be charged as costs against any party or be apportioned among some or all parties in the discretion of the court.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 23; R.S. 1887, § 1199; R.S. 1899, § 4298; C.S. 1910, § 5159; C.S. 1920, § 6435; R.S. 1931, § 89-1601; Laws 1935, ch. 41, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 3-3701; W.S. 1957, § 1-195; Laws 1961, ch. 189, § 1; 1963, ch. 170, § 1; 1975, ch. 141, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to right of witness to demand fees and expenses daily, see §

1-12-105

.

As to allowance of compensation to witnesses in proceedings in aid of execution, see §

1-17-416

.

As to payment of cost for witness not examined before justice of the peace, see §

1-21-103

.

As to fees of witnesses appearing before arbitrators under Uniform Arbitration Act, see §

1-36-109

.

As to fees of witnesses subpoenaed by county assessor, see §

18-3-204

.

As to fees for witnesses appearing before public service commission, see §

37-2-208

.

As to witness fees in causes relating to water rights, see §

41-3-328

.

The 2004 amendment

repealed former (a)(ii), which pertained to fees for attending before a justice of the peace, and made a related stylistic change.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Governing Statute.—

Award of costs
pursuant to the rule is governed by the district rule and the statute. Weinstein v. Beach, 2014 WY 167, 340 P.3d 1013,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2014).

No award of costs to nonindigent defendant acquitted of felony.
—

A trial court has no authority to grant costs to a nonindigent defendant who has been acquitted of a felony. Bernard v. State, 652 P.2d 982,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1982).

Witness costs are allowed for witnesses who are attending court or deposition sessions

under subpoena even though on particular days they may not testify. Hashimoto v. Marathon Pipe Line Co., 767 P.2d 158,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1989).

Fees which include time not spent in court attendance deleted.
—

The expert witness fees allowed as costs by the court included time not necessarily spent in court attendance for purposes of testifying and were therefore deleted. Furthermore, such costs should have been supported by evidence of reasonableness. Weaver v. Mitchell, 715 P.2d 1361,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 513

(Wyo. 1986).

Expert fees include actual time for testimony. —

Expert witness fees as determined by the court to be reasonable in amount should have included actual time for testimony and should not have included charges of the experts for pretrial conferences or time during the trial session while waiting to actually testify. Hashimoto v. Marathon Pipe Line Co., 767 P.2d 158,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1989).

Expert fees for depositions.—

Defendants
sought expert fees in the amount of $ 750.00 for their deposition
of plaintiffs' expert, but the rule and statute allow expert fees
of only $ 25.00 per day for trial testimony, or fees for actual trial
testimony at such higher rate as the court may determine, and neither
the rule nor the statute allows for the awarding of expert fees for
depositions, and this part of the award was reversed. Graus v. OK Invs., Inc., 2014 WY 166, 342 P.3d 365,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 2014).

Applicability.—

Conclusion
that the district rule applies to an offer of judgment award of costs
is supported by federal precedent; the rule regarding offers of judgment
does not authorize payment of all post-offer costs or expenses, and
those costs are not allowable unless authorized by the district rule
or the statute. Weinstein v. Beach, 2014 WY 167, 340 P.3d 1013,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2014).

Proper and improper fees. —

The following award of costs to the prevailing party was proper: witness fees for those days on which the witnesses attended, even if they did not testify on that day. The following award, however, was not proper: (1) service fees upon the parties with whom the successful party had settled; and (2) an expert witness fee for a physician who did not testify. State v. Dieringer, 708 P.2d 1,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 578

(Wyo. 1985).

Witness fees are payable by county in which criminal prosecution is originally instituted,

even though there be a change of venue to another county. Stoll v. Board of Comm'rs, 6 Wyo. 231, 44 P. 58,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1896).

No costs assessed as part of sentence. —

The Code Civil Procedure provides no authority for the assessment of costs as part of a criminal sentence or as a condition of probation. Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987).

Discretion of court. —

The phrase “such other amount as the court allows according to the circumstances of the case” gives the court discretion in determining the amount to award. This amount should be limited only to time spent actually testifying and should not include charges for pretrial conferences or time spent during trial while waiting to testify. Coulthard v. Cossairt, 803 P.2d 86,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1990), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Harris v. State, 487 P.2d 800,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1971); Buttrey Food Stores Div. v. Coulson, 620 P.2d 549,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 323

, 20 A.L.R.4th 419 (Wyo. 1980); Stauffer Chem. Co. v. Curry, 778 P.2d 1083,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1989).

Stated

in

Kaess v. State, 748 P.2d 698,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

See case note, “Constitutional Law — An Indigent's Right to a Free Trial Transcript. Mayer v. City of Chicago, 404 U.S. 189, 30 L. Ed. 2d 372, 92 S. Ct. 410, 1971 U.S. LEXIS 298 (1971),” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 707 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of witness detained in custody for future appearance to fees for such detention, 50 ALR2d 1439.

Allowance, as taxable costs, of witness fees and mileage of stockholders, directors, officers and employees of corporate litigant, 57 ALR2d 1243.

Allowance of mileage or witness fees with respect to witnesses who were not called to testify or not permitted to do so when called, 22 ALR3d 675.

Contingent fee informant testimony in state prosecutions, 57 ALR4th 643.

Compensation of expert witness as costs recoverable in federal civil action by prevailing party against party other than United States, 71 ALR Fed 875.

Taxation of costs associated with videotaped depositions under 28 U.S.C. § 1920 and Rule 54(d) of Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, 156 ALR Fed 311.

§ 1-14-103.
Witness or juror to receive only single fee.

No witness shall receive
fees or mileage in more than one (1) case covering the same period
of time or the same travel. Each witness shall make affidavit that
the fees and mileage claimed have not been claimed or received in
any other case. No juror shall receive pay as a witness while serving
as a juror.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 23; R.S. 1887, § 1199; R.S. 1899, § 4298; C.S. 1910, § 5159; C.S. 1920, § 6435; R.S. 1931, § 89-1601; Laws 1935, ch. 41, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 3-3701; W.S. 1957, § 1-195; Laws 1961, ch. 189, § 1; 1963, ch. 170, § 1; 1975, ch. 141, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to fees of jurors, see §§

1-11-303

.

§ 1-14-104.
Physician testifying as expert or performing postmortem or autopsy;
fees.

Any physician or surgeon
shall receive a reasonable fee as determined by the coroner when testifying
as an expert before a coroner or other officer for each half day or
portion thereof, and when conducting a postmortem examination or autopsy.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 78, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1200; R.S. 1899, § 4299; C.S. 1910, § 5160; C.S. 1920, § 6436; R.S. 1931, § 89-1602; C.S. 1945, § 3-3702; W.S. 1957, § 1-196; Laws 1965, ch. 74, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1990, ch. 70, § 1.

Applied

in

Johnson v. State, 532 P.2d 598,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1975).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of court which appoints or employs expert witnesses to tax their fees as costs, 39 ALR2d 1376.

§ 1-14-105.
Physician testifying as expert or performing postmortem or autopsy;
postmortem fee certificate; exceptions.

The coroner or other
officer who has ordered a postmortem examination shall issue to the
physician or surgeon a certificate for the fees provided, which shall
be paid by the board of county commissioners by issuing a county warrant
on the treasurer of the county in which the services were rendered
in the amount of the certificate. W.S.

1-14-104

and

1-14-105

do not apply in the case of any physician regularly employed
by the county.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 78, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1201; R.S. 1899, § 4300; C.S. 1910, § 5161; C.S. 1920, § 6437; R.S. 1931, § 89-1603; C.S. 1945, § 3-3703; W.S. 1957, § 1-197; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Services by county coroner. —

Under this section, the contract of a county employing its coroner to furnish medical aid to its paupers is not void as against public policy, in that the coroner could employ himself to make such examinations, since, under this section, fees would not be allowed in such a case. Baker v. Board of Comm'rs, 9 Wyo. 51, 59 P. 797,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1900).

§ 1-14-106.
Payment of fees in criminal cases.

In criminal cases where
the fees prescribed are not paid by the defendant or the prosecuting
witness, they shall be paid to the party entitled thereto by the public
defender’s office, if subpoenaed by a defendant represented by the
public defender, otherwise by the county.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 25; R.S. 1887, § 1210; R.S. 1899, § 4301; C.S. 1910, § 5162; C.S. 1920, § 6438; R.S. 1931, § 89-1604; C.S. 1945, § 3-3704; W.S. 1957, § 1-198; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1991, ch. 142, § 1.

No award of costs to nonindigent defendant acquitted of felony.
—

A trial court has no authority to grant costs to a nonindigent defendant who has been acquitted of a felony. Bernard v. State, 652 P.2d 982,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1982).

Payment by county where prosecution instituted. —

Witness fees are payable by the county in which a criminal prosecution is originally instituted, even though there be a change of venue to another county. Stoll v. Board of Comm'rs, 6 Wyo. 231, 44 P. 58,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1896).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Costs as chargeable to defendant in criminal prosecution, 65 ALR2d 854.

Imposition of costs in trial court as affected by death of defendant pending appeal from criminal conviction, 83 ALR2d 864.

Validity and construction of state statute or court rule fixing maximum fees for attorney appointed to represent indigent, 3 ALR4th 576.

§ 1-14-107.
Record of attendance and fees of jurors and witnesses.

The clerk of the district
court shall keep a record of the attendance and fees of jurors and
witnesses at each term of court when claimed during the term and for
which the county is liable.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 26; R.S. 1887, § 1211; R.S. 1899, § 4302; C.S. 1910, § 5163; C.S. 1920, § 6439; R.S. 1931, § 89-1605; C.S. 1945, § 3-3705; W.S. 1957, § 1-199; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-14-108.
Statement of attendance of jurors and witnesses in criminal cases.

Within ten (10) days
after the close of each term of a court of record, the clerk shall
return to the county commissioners a statement of the attendance of
jurors and witnesses at such term and their mileage as taken by him
in all criminal cases for which the county is liable.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 27; R.S. 1887, § 1212; R.S. 1899, § 4303; C.S. 1910, § 5164; C.S. 1920, § 6440; R.S. 1931, § 89-1606; C.S. 1945, § 3-3706; W.S. 1957, § 1-200; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-14-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009,
ch. 168, § 207.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1879, ch. 40, § 1, related to names of all witnesses on single subpoena, separate subpoena for defendant's witnesses, and affidavit.

Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 1-14-110.
Only actual mileage allowed for service; liability for false statement.

If any officer or other
person who is allowed mileage for any services rendered receives at
the same time more than one (1) writ or process to serve, or authority
to render more than one (1) service at the same place, he is only
entitled to mileage for the actual number of miles traveled, allowing
a full mile from place to place for every person served or every service
rendered during the same journey. His return or claim for mileage
shall show the actual number of miles necessarily traveled from the
place where he received his authority to the place where the actual
service was made or rendered. Should any false statement for mileage
be proved, then no mileage shall be allowed for any services performed
by virtue of the authority, writ or process by which such services
were rendered and the maker of the false statement is liable to criminal
process.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 40, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1215; R.S. 1899, § 4305; C.S. 1910, § 5166; C.S. 1920, § 6442; R.S. 1931, § 89-1608; C.S. 1945, § 3-3708; W.S. 1957, § 1-202; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-14-111.
Witness or juror entitled to but single day's service for multiple
criminal cases and on grand juries.

If a witness or juror
is summoned to serve in more than one (1) criminal case in the same
court on the same day, the witness or juror is entitled to but one
(1) day’s service, which shall be taxed as costs in the first case.
The officer swearing the witness or juror shall keep a proper account
of the fees in order that not more than one (1) payment is made under
such circumstances. This also applies to grand juries and witnesses
before grand juries.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 40, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 1217; R.S. 1899, § 4307; C.S. 1910, § 5168; C.S. 1920, § 6444; R.S. 1931, § 89-1610; C.S. 1945, § 3-3709; W.S. 1957, § 1-203; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-14-112.
Court officers not allowed witness fees.

An officer whose duty
it is to be in constant attendance upon any court and who is sworn
as a witness in a case then pending in that court, is not entitled
to witness fees in the case.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 40, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1218; R.S. 1899, § 4308; C.S. 1910, § 5169; C.S. 1920, § 6445; R.S. 1931, § 89-1611; C.S. 1945, § 3-3710; W.S. 1957, § 1-204; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-14-113.
Officer's fees to be posted; penalty.

Each officer herein named
shall post a list of his fees in his office in a conspicuous place.
For failure to do so he shall pay three dollars ($3.00) per day for
each day of failure, which may be recovered by the county in a civil
action.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 28; R.S. 1887, § 1219; R.S. 1899, § 4309; C.S. 1910, § 5170; C.S. 1920, § 6446; R.S. 1931, § 89-1612; C.S. 1945, § 3-3711; W.S. 1957, § 1-205; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to sheriff's fees, see §

18-3-608

.

§ 1-14-114.
Officer's return to show his fees.

An officer serving any
process or order is not entitled to fees for service unless he returns
on the process the amount of his fees and the items thereof.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 29; R.S. 1887, § 1220; R.S. 1899, § 4310; C.S. 1910, § 5171; C.S. 1920, § 6447; R.S. 1931, § 89-1613; C.S. 1945, § 3-3712; W.S. 1957, § 1-206; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to sheriff's fees, see §

18-3-608

.

§ 1-14-115.
Right to receive certified bill of costs or fees.

Any person liable for
any costs or fees is entitled to receive on demand a certified bill
of the same, in which the items of service and the charges therefor
are stated.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 30; R.S. 1887, § 1221; R.S. 1899, § 4311; C.S. 1910, § 5172; C.S. 1920, § 6448; R.S. 1931, § 89-1614; C.S. 1945, § 3-3713; W.S. 1957, § 1-207; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to allowance of premiums for bonds as part of costs, see §

38-2-109

.

§ 1-14-116.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004,
ch. 42, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 31, read: “Every justice of the peace shall tax the cost of every criminal prosecution or trial before him and certify the cost to the board of county commissioners in all cases in which the county is liable therefor.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-14-117.
Disposition of costs collected.

Every sheriff and other
officer collecting costs on execution, after retaining the amount
of his own fees shall pay the residue of the collected costs to the
clerk of the court which issued the execution and take a receipt therefor.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 32; R.S. 1887, § 1223; R.S. 1899, § 4313; C.S. 1910, § 5174; C.S. 1920, § 6450; R.S. 1931, § 89-1616; C.S. 1945, § 3-3715; W.S. 1957, § 1-209; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to collection of fees by bailiff for supreme court and payment into state treasury, see §

5-2-303

.

For duty of the clerk of district court to collect fees in advance and pay to county treasurer monthly, see §

5-3-205

.

As to sheriff's fees, see §

18-3-608

.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “or to the justice” following “which issued the execution.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-14-118.
Payment of fees and compensation.

All fees provided for
by law when due from any party other than the state or the county
are payable in advance to the person entitled to them. All fees and
compensation due any person from the county are payable once every
three (3) months by warrants drawn upon the county treasury in the
manner provided by law, unless herein otherwise provided.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 35; R.S. 1887, § 1225; R.S. 1899, § 4315; C.S. 1910, § 5176; C.S. 1920, § 6452; R.S. 1931, § 89-1618; C.S. 1945, § 3-3718; W.S. 1957, § 1-211; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Kane v. Dobler, 53 Wyo. 252, 81 P.2d 300,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 17

, 117 A.L.R. 1393 (1938).

§ 1-14-119.
Nonresidents and partnerships suing in company name to furnish security;
requirements.

If a nonresident of the
state or a partnership suing in its company name brings an action,
the plaintiff must furnish sufficient security for costs approved
by the clerk. A surety’s obligations are complete by his endorsing
the summons or complaint. The surety is bound for the payment of all
costs adjudged or taxed against the plaintiff in the court in which
the action is brought or in any other court to which it may be carried,
whether he obtains judgment or not. The nonresident plaintiff may
deposit with the clerk of court as security for costs in the case
such sum of money as the clerk deems sufficient for the purpose. Upon
motion of the defendant, the court may require the deposit to be increased,
that personal security be given or that the nonresident plaintiff
pay all costs as fast as they accrue.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 347; R.S. 1887, § 2687; R.S. 1899, § 3781; C.S. 1910, § 4636; Laws 1911, ch. 73, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 5909; R.S. 1931, § 89-2701; C.S. 1945, § 3-3719; W.S. 1957, § 1-212; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Widow who is nonresident may be required to furnish security

for costs on her application to have the homestead of her deceased husband set apart for her use. Ullman v. Abbott, 10 Wyo. 97, 67 P. 467,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1902).

Cost bond. —

In view of its language and the statute under which it was given, plaintiff's cost bond was held to have covered judgment for costs in favor of defendant on her cross-petition. Wyoming Cent. Irrigation Co. v. Laporte, 26 Wyo. 522, 188 P. 360,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1920).

Discretion of the court. —

The court may, but is not required to, order security of costs from a nonresident father. KC v. KM (In re IC), 941 P.2d 46,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 1-14-120.
Nonresidents and partnerships suing in company name to furnish security;
failure to give security.

If security for costs
is not given as required by W.S.

1-14-119

or if the costs are not paid, the court shall at any
time before the commencement of the trial, on motion of the defendant
and notice to the plaintiff, dismiss the action unless within a reasonable
time allowed by the court security is given.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 348; R.S. 1887, § 2688; R.S. 1899, § 3782; C.S. 1910, § 4637; C.S. 1920, § 5910; R.S. 1931, § 89-2702; C.S. 1945, § 3-3720; W.S. 1957, § 1-213; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Discretion of the court. —

The court may, but is not required to, order security of costs from a nonresident father. KC v. KM (In re IC), 941 P.2d 46,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 1-14-121.
Nonresident and partnership suing in company name to furnish security;
when plaintiff becomes nonresident of county.

If the plaintiff becomes
a nonresident of the county in which the action is brought during
its pendency, he may be compelled to give security in the manner stated
in W.S.

1-14-119

and

1-14-120

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 349; R.S. 1887, § 2689; R.S. 1899, § 3783; C.S. 1910, § 4638; C.S. 1920, § 5911; R.S. 1931, § 89-2703; C.S. 1945, § 3-3721; W.S. 1957, § 1-214; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 1-14-122.
Additional security upon motion of defendant.

In an action in which
security for costs has been given, the defendant may at any time before
the commencement of the trial, after reasonable notice to the plaintiff,
move the court for additional security. If on the motion the court
is satisfied that the surety has moved from this state or the security
is not sufficient the action may be dismissed unless in a reasonable
time fixed by the court sufficient security is given.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 350; R.S. 1887, § 2690; R.S. 1899, § 3784; C.S. 1910, § 4639; C.S. 1920, § 5912; R.S. 1931, § 89-2704; C.S. 1945, § 3-3722; W.S. 1957, § 1-215; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 1-14-123.
Judgment against surety for costs; execution.

After final judgment
in an action in which security for costs is given, the court may on
motion of the defendant or a person having a right to costs, after
ten (10) days notice of the motion, render judgment in the name of
the movant against the surety, his executors or administrators, for
the costs adjudged against the plaintiff. Execution may be issued
on the judgment as in other cases for the use and benefit of the person
entitled to the costs.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 351; R.S. 1887, § 2691; R.S. 1899, § 3785; C.S. 1910, § 4640; C.S. 1920, § 5913; R.S. 1931, § 89-2705; C.S. 1945, § 3-3723; W.S. 1957, § 1-216; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to rights and remedies of sureties and surety companies generally, see title 38.

As to judgment against surety in connection with appeals to supreme court, see Rule 4.05, W.R.A.P.

§ 1-14-124.
Costs allowed for recovery of money or property.

Costs shall be allowed
to the plaintiff upon a judgment in his favor in an action for the
recovery of money only or for the recovery of specific real or personal
property, unless otherwise provided by law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 355; R.S. 1887, § 2695; R.S. 1899, § 3789; C.S. 1910, § 4644; C.S. 1920, § 5917; R.S. 1931, § 89-2709; C.S. 1945, § 3-3727; W.S. 1957, § 1-220; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to allowance of premiums for bonds as part of costs, see §

38-2-109

.

Costs allowed in counterclaim. —

Plaintiff, recovering a judgment for $120.00, after allowance of a counterclaim, was entitled to costs. Holgate v. Downer, 8 Wyo. 334, 57 P. 918,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1899).

But not in trespass case. —

This section does not entitle plaintiff to recover his costs in action for trespass on oil and gas rights by attempt to drill well. Martel v. Hall Oil Co., 36 Wyo. 166, 253 P. 862,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 36 Wyo. 166, 255 P. 3,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1927).

Costs “reasonably required for trial preparation” allowed.
—

The award of costs, including subpoena, reporter and witness fees for a discovery deposition, was discretionary with the trial court as coming within the criteria of “reasonably required for trial preparation.” Hashimoto v. Marathon Pipe Line Co., 767 P.2d 158,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1989).

Expert fees include actual time for testimony. —

Expert witness fees as determined by the court to be reasonable in amount should have included actual time for testimony and should not have included charges of the experts for pretrial conferences or time during the trial session while waiting to actually testify. Hashimoto v. Marathon Pipe Line Co., 767 P.2d 158,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1989).

Proper and improper costs. —

The following award of costs to the prevailing party was proper: witness fees for those days on which the witnesses attended, even if they did not testify on that day. The following award, however, was not proper: (1) service fees upon the parties with whom the successful party had settled; and (2) an expert witness fee for a physician who did not testify. State v. Dieringer, 708 P.2d 1,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 578

(Wyo. 1985).

Prevailing party. —

Defaulted defendant was regarded as the prevailing party and was entitled to award of costs, since plaintiff did not improve her position by the litigation, but defendant improved his position substantially over the result indicated by the entry of default. Schaub v. Wilson, 969 P.2d 552,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1998).

Rejection of more favorable offer of settlement. —

A plaintiff who rejected an offer of settlement that was more favorable than the amount she was eventually awarded by a jury was entitled to recover only those costs she incurred up until the time the offer was made, and the defendant was entitled to recover those costs incurred after the offer was made. Crawford v. Amadio, 932 P.2d 1288,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1997).

Stated

in

Kaess v. State, 748 P.2d 698,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1987); Morris v. CMS Oil & Gas Co., 2010 WY 37, 227 P.3d 325,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Mar. 25, 2010).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Ethics and the Reasonableness of Contingency Fees: A Survey of State and Federal Law Addressing the Reasonableness of Costs as They Relate to Contingency Fee Arrangements,” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 215 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Storage or similar caretaking charges as taxable cost in proceeding to forfeit personal property, 60 ALR2d 813.

Taxable costs and disbursements as including expenses for bonds incident to steps taken in action, 90 ALR2d 448.

Allowance as costs of such items as maps, models, wall charts, photographs and the like, 97 A.L.R.2d 138.

Attorneys' fees as recoverable in fraud action, 44 ALR4th 776.

§ 1-14-125.
When costs
not recoverable by plaintiff.

When the judgment is
less than one hundred dollars ($100.00), unless the recovery is reduced
below that sum by counterclaim or setoff, each party shall pay his
own costs. When the damage assessed is under five dollars ($5.00),
the plaintiff shall not recover costs in any action for libel, slander,
malicious prosecution, assault, assault and battery, false imprisonment
or nuisance.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 356; R.S. 1887, § 2696; R.S. 1899, § 3790; C.S. 1910, § 4645; C.S. 1920, § 5918; R.S. 1931, § 89-2710; C.S. 1945, § 3-3728; W.S. 1957, § 1-221; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “or against a justice of the peace for misconduct in office” at the end of the section and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

In general. —

Costs taxable as part of the judgment in favor of the prevailing party are part of the judgment and an incident thereto. Wyoming Cent. Irrigation Co. v. Laporte, 26 Wyo. 522, 188 P. 360,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1920).

Applicability. —

The statute, which speaks to a plaintiff's ability to recover costs, did not apply to the defendants, who successfully defended against the plaintiffs' action. Snyder v. Lovercheck, 2001 WY 64, 27 P.3d 695,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2001).

Each party to pay own costs. —

Where plaintiff appellant was entitled to nominal damages, judgment will be modified to order each party to pay his own costs, both on trial and on appeal. Martel v. Hall Oil Co., 36 Wyo. 166, 253 P. 862,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 36 Wyo. 166, 255 P. 3,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1927).

Nominal damages.—

In determining
the amount appellee lost because of the vehicles parked on his property,
the evidence presented was too remote to sustain the damages awarded
by the district court; the case was remanded for the district court
to award nominal damages not to exceed $ 100 for the trespass relating
to the pickup truck and camper, as the court interprets the statute
as the legislature's determination of the maximum amount that can
constitute nominal damages, and this was the result case law required
in this case. Goforth v. Fifield, 2015 WY 82, 352 P.3d 242,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2015).

Costs to neither party. —

In action for damages for removing cattle from enclosed tract of pasturage belonging in alternate sections to government and defendant, when it appears that no injury was done in the removal, and that land to which they were removed was superior to that enclosed, and plaintiff would not, in any event, be entitled to more than nominal damages, if any, judgment for defendant, with costs to neither party, will not be reversed. Hecht v. Harrison, 5 Wyo. 279, 40 P. 306,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1895).

Applied

in

Roberts Constr. Co. v. Vondriska, 547 P.2d 1171,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

Holgate v. Downer, 8 Wyo. 334, 57 P. 918,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1899).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).